Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1346.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 29, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2903.18, to read: START_STATUTE36-2903.18. Claims review time frame; fee-for-service; administrative deficiencies Within seventy-two hours after receiving a claim, the system's division of fee-for-service management shall notify the person or entity that submitted the claim of all administrative deficiencies in the claim, if any.  If the person or entity corrects all administrative deficiencies in the claim or if there were no administrative deficiencies in the claim, the administration shall either approve or deny the claim within ten business days. END_STATUTE